Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1216
Board; duties.

In addition to any other responsibilities prescribed by the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, the board shall:

(1) Promote the dissemination of public information and education programs to inform the public about emergency medical service and other medical information, including appropriate methods of medical self-help, first aid, and the availability of emergency medical services training programs in the state;

(2) Provide for the collection of information for evaluation of the availability and quality of emergency medical care, evaluate the availability and quality of emergency medical care, and serve as a focal point for discussion of the provision of emergency medical care;

(3) Establish model procedures for patient management in medical emergencies that do not limit the authority of law enforcement and fire protection personnel to manage the scene during a medical emergency; and

(4) Identify communication needs of emergency medical services and make recommendations for development of a communications plan for a communications network for emergency care providers and emergency medical services.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5177;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 500;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 38;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 19;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 29;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 4.